Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.15.032

Certificate of authority as insurance company—Filing of records.

For those corporations that have a certificate of authority, are applying for, or intend to apply for a certificate of authority from the insurance commissioner as an insurance company under chapter 48.05 RCW, whenever under this chapter corporate records are required to be filed with the secretary of state, the records shall be filed with the insurance commissioner rather than the secretary of state.

[ 2002 c 297 s 42; 1998 c 23 s 11.]